Illinois, session 104th, HB1178.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 17a-9 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/17a-9)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5017a-9)7    Sec. 17a-9. Illinois Juvenile Justice Commission. 8    (a) There is hereby created the Illinois Juvenile Justice 9Commission which shall consist of 25 persons appointed by the 10Governor. The Chairperson of the Commission shall be appointed 11by the Governor. Of the initial appointees, 8 shall serve a 12one-year term, 8 shall serve a two-year term and 9 shall serve 13a three-year term. Thereafter, each successor shall serve a 14three-year term. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner 15as original appointments. Once appointed, members shall serve 16until their successors are appointed and qualified. Members 17shall serve without compensation, except they shall be 18reimbursed for their actual expenses in the performance of 19their duties. The Commission shall carry out the rights, 20powers and duties established in subparagraph (3) of paragraph 21(a) of Section 223 of the Federal "Juvenile Justice and 22Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974", as now or hereafter 23amended. The Commission shall determine the priorities for   HB1178- 2 -LRB104 04970 RLC 14997 b1expenditure of funds made available to the State by the 2Federal Government pursuant to that Act. The Commission shall 3have the following powers and duties:4        (1) Development, review and final approval of the 5    State's juvenile justice plan for funds under the Federal 6    "Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974";7        (2) Review and approve or disapprove juvenile justice 8    and delinquency prevention grant applications to the 9    Department for federal funds under that Act;10        (3) Annual submission of recommendations to the 11    Governor and the General Assembly concerning matters 12    relative to its function;13        (4) Responsibility for the review of funds allocated 14    to Illinois under the "Juvenile Justice and Delinquency 15    Prevention Act of 1974" to ensure compliance with all 16    relevant federal laws and regulations; 17        (5) Function as the advisory committee for the State 18    Youth and Community Services Program as authorized under 19    Section 17 of this Act, and in that capacity be authorized 20    and empowered to assist and advise the Secretary of Human 21    Services on matters related to juvenile justice and 22    delinquency prevention programs and services; and23        (5.5) Study and make recommendations to the General 24    Assembly regarding the availability of youth services to 25    reduce the use of detention and prevent deeper criminal 26    involvement and regarding the impact and advisability of   HB1178- 3 -LRB104 04970 RLC 14997 b1    raising the minimum age of detention to 14, and develop a 2    process to assist in the implementation of the provisions 3    of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly; and 4        (6) Study the impact of, develop timelines, and 5    propose a funding structure to accommodate the expansion 6    of the jurisdiction of the Illinois Juvenile Court to 7    include youth age 17 under the jurisdiction of the 8    Juvenile Court Act of 1987. The Commission shall submit a 9    report by December 31, 2011 to the General Assembly with 10    recommendations on extending juvenile court jurisdiction 11    to youth age 17 charged with felony offenses.12    (b) On the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 1396th General Assembly, the Illinois Juvenile Jurisdiction Task 14Force created by Public Act 95-1031 is abolished and its 15duties are transferred to the Illinois Juvenile Justice 16Commission as provided in paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of 17this Section. 18(Source: P.A. 96-1199, eff. 1-1-11.) 19    Section 10. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 20changing Section 5-410 as follows: 21    (705 ILCS 405/5-410)22    Sec. 5-410. Non-secure custody or detention. 23    (1) Placement of a minor away from his or her home must be 24a last resort and the least restrictive alternative available.   HB1178- 4 -LRB104 04970 RLC 14997 b1Any minor arrested or taken into custody pursuant to this Act 2who requires care away from the minor's home but who does not 3require physical restriction shall be given temporary care in 4a foster family home or other shelter facility designated by 5the court.6    (2)(a-1) On or after July 1, 2026 and before July 1, 2027, 7any minor 12 years of age or older arrested pursuant to this 8Act where there is probable cause to believe that the minor is 9a delinquent minor and that secure custody is a matter of 10immediate and urgent necessity, in light of a serious threat 11to the physical safety of a person or persons in the community 12or in order to secure the presence of the minor at the next 13hearing, as evidenced by a demonstrable record of willful 14failure to appear at a scheduled court hearing within the past 1512 months, may be kept or detained in an authorized detention 16facility. On or after July 1, 2027, minors age 12 years of age 17and under 13 years of age and charged with first degree murder, 18aggravated criminal sexual assault, aggravated battery in 19which a firearm was used in the offense, or aggravated 20vehicular hijacking, may be kept or detained in an authorized 21detention facility. On and after July 1, 2026, any minor 13 22years of age or older arrested pursuant to this Act where there 23is probable cause to believe that the minor is a delinquent 24minor and that secure custody is a matter of immediate and 25urgent necessity in light of a serious threat to the physical 26safety of a person or persons in the community, or to secure   HB1178- 5 -LRB104 04970 RLC 14997 b1the presence of the minor at the next hearing as evidenced by a 2demonstrable record of willful failure to appear at a 3scheduled court hearing within the past 12 months may be kept 4or detained in an authorized detention facility. (a) Any minor 510 years of age or older arrested pursuant to this Act where 6there is probable cause to believe that the minor is a 7delinquent minor and that (i) secure custody is a matter of 8immediate and urgent necessity for the protection of the minor 9or of the person or property of another, (ii) the minor is 10likely to flee the jurisdiction of the court, or (iii) the 11minor was taken into custody under a warrant, may be kept or 12detained in an authorized detention facility. A minor under 13 13years of age shall not be admitted, kept, or detained in a 14detention facility unless a local youth service provider, 15including a provider through the Comprehensive Community Based 16Youth Services network, has been contacted and has not been 17able to accept the minor. No minor under 13 12 years of age 18shall be detained in a county jail or a municipal lockup for 19more than 6 hours.20    (a-2) Probation and court services shall document and 21share on a monthly basis with the Illinois Juvenile Justice 22Commission each instance where alternatives to detention 23failed or were lacking, including the basis for detention, the 24providers who were contacted, and the reason alternatives were 25rejected, lacking or denied.26    (a-3) Instead of detention, minors under the age of 13 who   HB1178- 6 -LRB104 04970 RLC 14997 b1are in conflict with the law may be held accountable through a 2petition under Article 3, Minors Requiring Authoritative 3Intervention, or may be held accountable through a community 4mediation program as set forth in Section 5-310. 5    (a-5) For a minor arrested or taken into custody for 6vehicular hijacking or aggravated vehicular hijacking, a 7previous finding of delinquency for vehicular hijacking or 8aggravated vehicular hijacking shall be given greater weight 9in determining whether secured custody of a minor is a matter 10of immediate and urgent necessity for the protection of the 11minor or of the person or property of another. 12    (b) The written authorization of the probation officer or 13detention officer (or other public officer designated by the 14court in a county having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants) 15constitutes authority for the superintendent of any juvenile 16detention home to detain and keep a minor for up to 40 hours, 17excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and court-designated holidays. 18These records shall be available to the same persons and 19pursuant to the same conditions as are law enforcement records 20as provided in Section 5-905.21    (b-4) The consultation required by paragraph (b-5) shall 22not be applicable if the probation officer or detention 23officer (or other public officer designated by the court in a 24county having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants) utilizes a 25scorable detention screening instrument, which has been 26developed with input by the State's Attorney, to determine   HB1178- 7 -LRB104 04970 RLC 14997 b1whether a minor should be detained; however, paragraph (b-5) 2shall still be applicable where no such screening instrument 3is used or where the probation officer, detention officer (or 4other public officer designated by the court in a county 5having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants) deviates from the 6screening instrument.7    (b-5) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (b-4), if a 8probation officer or detention officer (or other public 9officer designated by the court in a county having 3,000,000 10or more inhabitants) does not intend to detain a minor for an 11offense which constitutes one of the following offenses, the 12probation officer or detention officer (or other public 13officer designated by the court in a county having 3,000,000 14or more inhabitants) shall consult with the State's Attorney's 15Office prior to the release of the minor: first degree murder, 16second degree murder, involuntary manslaughter, criminal 17sexual assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, aggravated 18battery with a firearm as described in Section 12-4.2 or 19subdivision (e)(1), (e)(2), (e)(3), or (e)(4) of Section 2012-3.05, aggravated or heinous battery involving permanent 21disability or disfigurement or great bodily harm, robbery, 22aggravated robbery, armed robbery, vehicular hijacking, 23aggravated vehicular hijacking, vehicular invasion, arson, 24aggravated arson, kidnapping, aggravated kidnapping, home 25invasion, burglary, or residential burglary.26    (c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a), (d), or   HB1178- 8 -LRB104 04970 RLC 14997 b1(e), no minor shall be detained in a county jail or municipal 2lockup for more than 12 hours, unless the offense is a crime of 3violence in which case the minor may be detained up to 24 4hours. For the purpose of this paragraph, "crime of violence" 5has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1-10 of the Substance 6Use Disorder Act.7        (i) The period of detention is deemed to have begun 8    once the minor has been placed in a locked room or cell or 9    handcuffed to a stationary object in a building housing a 10    county jail or municipal lockup. Time spent transporting a 11    minor is not considered to be time in detention or secure 12    custody.13        (ii) Any minor so confined shall be under periodic 14    supervision and shall not be permitted to come into or 15    remain in contact with adults in custody in the building.16        (iii) Upon placement in secure custody in a jail or 17    lockup, the minor shall be informed of the purpose of the 18    detention, the time it is expected to last and the fact 19    that it cannot exceed the time specified under this Act.20        (iv) A log shall be kept which shows the offense which 21    is the basis for the detention, the reasons and 22    circumstances for the decision to detain, and the length 23    of time the minor was in detention.24        (v) Violation of the time limit on detention in a 25    county jail or municipal lockup shall not, in and of 26    itself, render inadmissible evidence obtained as a result   HB1178- 9 -LRB104 04970 RLC 14997 b1    of the violation of this time limit. Minors under 18 years 2    of age shall be kept separate from confined adults and may 3    not at any time be kept in the same cell, room, or yard 4    with adults confined pursuant to criminal law. Persons 18 5    years of age and older who have a petition of delinquency 6    filed against them may be confined in an adult detention 7    facility. In making a determination whether to confine a 8    person 18 years of age or older who has a petition of 9    delinquency filed against the person, these factors, among 10    other matters, shall be considered:11            (A) the age of the person;12            (B) any previous delinquent or criminal history of 13        the person;14            (C) any previous abuse or neglect history of the 15        person; and16            (D) any mental health or educational history of 17        the person, or both.18    (d)(i) If a minor 12 years of age or older is confined in a 19county jail in a county with a population below 3,000,000 20inhabitants, then the minor's confinement shall be implemented 21in such a manner that there will be no contact by sight, sound, 22or otherwise between the minor and adult prisoners. Minors 12 23years of age or older must be kept separate from confined 24adults and may not at any time be kept in the same cell, room, 25or yard with confined adults. This paragraph (d)(i) shall only 26apply to confinement pending an adjudicatory hearing and shall   HB1178- 10 -LRB104 04970 RLC 14997 b1not exceed 40 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and 2court-designated holidays. To accept or hold minors during 3this time period, county jails shall comply with all 4monitoring standards adopted by the Department of Corrections 5and training standards approved by the Illinois Law 6Enforcement Training Standards Board.7    (ii) To accept or hold minors, 12 years of age or older, 8after the time period prescribed in paragraph (d)(i) of this 9subsection (2) of this Section but not exceeding 7 days 10including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays pending an 11adjudicatory hearing, county jails shall comply with all 12temporary detention standards adopted by the Department of 13Corrections and training standards approved by the Illinois 14Law Enforcement Training Standards Board.15    (iii) To accept or hold minors 12 years of age or older, 16after the time period prescribed in paragraphs (d)(i) and 17(d)(ii) of this subsection (2) of this Section, county jails 18shall comply with all county juvenile detention standards 19adopted by the Department of Juvenile Justice.20    (e) When a minor who is at least 15 years of age is 21prosecuted under the criminal laws of this State, the court 22may enter an order directing that the juvenile be confined in 23the county jail. However, any juvenile confined in the county 24jail under this provision shall be separated from adults who 25are confined in the county jail in such a manner that there 26will be no contact by sight, sound, or otherwise between the   HB1178- 11 -LRB104 04970 RLC 14997 b1juvenile and adult prisoners.2    (f) For purposes of appearing in a physical lineup, the 3minor may be taken to a county jail or municipal lockup under 4the direct and constant supervision of a juvenile police 5officer. During such time as is necessary to conduct a lineup, 6and while supervised by a juvenile police officer, the sight 7and sound separation provisions shall not apply.8    (g) For purposes of processing a minor, the minor may be 9taken to a county jail or municipal lockup under the direct and 10constant supervision of a law enforcement officer or 11correctional officer. During such time as is necessary to 12process the minor, and while supervised by a law enforcement 13officer or correctional officer, the sight and sound 14separation provisions shall not apply.15    (3) If the probation officer or State's Attorney (or such 16other public officer designated by the court in a county 17having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants) determines that the 18minor may be a delinquent minor as described in subsection (3) 19of Section 5-105, and should be retained in custody but does 20not require physical restriction, the minor may be placed in 21non-secure custody for up to 40 hours pending a detention 22hearing.23    (4) Any minor taken into temporary custody, not requiring 24secure detention, may, however, be detained in the home of the 25minor's parent or guardian subject to such conditions as the 26court may impose.  HB1178- 12 -LRB104 04970 RLC 14997 b1    (5) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 98-61 2apply to a minor who has been arrested or taken into custody on 3or after January 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 498-61). 5(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)